src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON u1smse   ! olja, olje-
 +N: Re ;
     u1 ;

LEXICON u1sms   ! flicka, flick-
 +N: R ;
     u1 ;

LEXICON u1     ! lampa
+N+Utr+Sg+Indef:%>a K ;
+N+Utr+Sg+Def:%>an K ;
+N+Utr+Pl:%>or uplspec ;

LEXICON u2sms   ! båt, båt-
 +N: R ;
     u2 ;

LEXICON u2     ! båt
+N+Utr+Sg+Indef: K ;
+N+Utr+Sg+Def:%>en K ;
+N+Utr+Pl:%>ar uplspec ;


LEXICON u3     ! gäst
+N+Utr+Sg+Indef: K ;
+N+Utr+Sg+Def:%>en K ;
+N+Utr+Pl:%>er uplspec  ;

LEXICON u5sms   ! vandrare, vandrar-
 +N: R ;
     u5 ;

LEXICON u5     ! lärare
+N+Utr+Sg+Indef:%>e K ;
+N+Utr+Sg+Def:%>en K ;
+N+Utr+Pl+Indef:%>e K ;
+N+Utr+Pl+Def:%>na K ;


LEXICON u6    ! pojke
+N+Utr+Sg+Indef:%>e K ;
+N+Utr+Sg+Def:%>en K ;
+N+Utr+Pl:%>ar uplspec  ;

LEXICON mor ! stam = null
+N+Utr+Sg+Indef:mor K ; ! "suffix" = mor
+N+Utr+Pl:mödrar mödrar ;
+N:mor R ;

LEXICON moder ! 
+N+Utr+Sg+Indef: K ;
+N+Utr+Sg+Def:%>n K ;
+N+Utr+Pl:mödrar mödrar ;
+N: R ;

LEXICON mödrar !
+Indef: K ;
+Def:%>na K ;

LEXICON u_tantum ! kläder
+N+Utr+Pl: uplspec ;

LEXICON uplspec    ! pl
+Indef: K ;
+Def:%>na K ;

LEXICON n4     ! ställe
+N+Neu+Sg+Indef: K ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Def:%>t K ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Indef:%>n K ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Def:%>na K ;


LEXICON n5     ! barn
+N+Neu+Sg+Indef: K ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Def:%>et K ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Indef: K ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Def:%>en K ;

LEXICON n5m    ! hem
+N+Neu+Sg+Indef: K ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Def:m%>et K ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Indef: K ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Def:m%>en K ;


LEXICON n5_-s  ! hus
+N+Neu+Sg+Indef: # ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Def:%>et K ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Indef: # ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Def:%>en K ;


LEXICON n7     ! parti
+N+Neu+Sg+Indef: K ;
! +N+Neu+Sg+Def:%>et K ;
! +N+Neu+Pl+Indef:%>er K ;
! +N+Neu+Pl+Def:%>erna K ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Def:%>e2t K ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Indef:%>e2r K ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Def:%>e2rna K ;


LEXICON n8     ! bi 
+N+Neu+Sg+Indef: K ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Def:%>e2t K ;
! +N+Neu+Sg+Def:%>et K ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Indef:%>n K ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Def:%>na K ;

LEXICON n9     ! märke
+N+Neu+Sg+Indef: K ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Def:%>t K ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Indef:%>n K ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Def:%>na K ;

LEXICON n9R0      ! kaffe
 +N: R0 ;
     n9 ;

LEXICON n9Rs      ! märke 
 +N: Rs ;
     n9 ;

LEXICON akroV     ! SJ -- TEMP!!
+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR: # ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR:%: K ;

LEXICON prop-plats      ! TEMP!
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: # ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: K ;
